Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4588.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 303. (1) Subject to subsection (8), for an individual's
name to appear on the official ballot as a candidate for school
board member of a school district other than a local school
district, the candidate shall file a nominating petition and the
affidavit required by under section 558 with the school district
filing official not later than 4 p.m. on the fifteenth Tuesday
STM H02152'25 (H-1) 3bm7kr


before the election date. Subject to subsection (8), for an
individual's name to appear under a particular political party
heading on the official primary ballot as a candidate for school
board member of a local school district, the candidate shall file a
nominating petition and the affidavit required under section 558
with the school district filing official not later than 4 p.m. on
the fifteenth Tuesday before the August primary. The nominating
petition must be signed by the following number of electors of the
school district:
(a) If the population of the school district is less than
10,000, according to the most recent federal census, a minimum of 6
and a maximum of 20.
(b) If the population of the school district is 10,000 or
more, according to the most recent federal census, a minimum of 40
and a maximum of 100.
(2) The Subject to this subsection, the nominating petition
for a candidate for school board member of a local school district
must be partisan and be substantially in the form prescribed in
section 544c. , except that the petition Subject to this
subsection, the nominating petition for a candidate for school
board member of a school district other than a local school
district must be nonpartisan and otherwise be substantially in the
form prescribed in section 544c. A nominating petition under this
subsection must include the following opening paragraph, and, for a
candidate for school board member of a local school district, must
also include the phrase "and candidate of the ___________ party"
following "a registered and qualified elector of the district" in
the following opening paragraph:
We, the undersigned, registered and qualified voterselectors
STM H02152'25 (H-1) 3bm7kr


of _______________________________________________________
(legal name of school district)
and residents of the _______________________________, the
(legal name of school district)(city or township)
county of _____________________________, state of Michigan,
(city or township)
nominate __________________________________________________
(name of candidate)
_______________________________ ________________________,
(street address) (city or township)
a registered and qualified elector of the district as a member of
the board of education of the school district for a term of ______
years, expiring ______, to be voted for at the election to be held
on the ______ day of ___________, ______.
(month) (year)
(3) An individual shall not knowingly sign more nominating
petitions for the same office than there are persons individuals to
be elected to the office. An individual who violates this
subsection is guilty of a misdemeanor.
(4) An individual shall not do any of the following:
(a) Sign a nominating petition with a name other than his or
her the individual's own name.
(b) Make a false statement in a certificate on a nominating
petition.
(c) If not a circulator, sign a nominating petition as a
circulator.
(d) Sign a name as circulator other than his or her the
individual's own name.
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (6), an
STM H02152'25 (H-1) 3bm7kr


individual who violates subsection (4) is guilty of a misdemeanor
punishable by a fine of not more than $500.00, or imprisonment for
not more than 93 days, or both.
(6) An individual shall not sign a nominating petition with
multiple names. An individual who violates this subsection is
guilty of a felony.
(7) If an individual signs a nominating petition in violation
of this section, any signature by that individual on the petition
is invalid and must not be counted.
(8) Instead of filing nominating petitions, a candidate for
school board member may pay a nonrefundable filing fee of $100.00
to the school district filing official. If this filing fee is paid
by the due date for a nominating petition, the payment has the same
effect under this section as the filing of a nominating petition.
(9) A nominating petition filed under this chapter is subject
to the examination and investigation process prescribed in section
552 as to its the nominating petition's sufficiency and the
validity and genuineness of the signatures on the nominating
petition, and to the other procedures prescribed in that section
relevant to a nominating petition filed under this chapter.
(10) After a nominating petition is filed or filing fee is
paid for a candidate for school board member, the candidate is not
permitted to withdraw unless a written withdrawal notice, signed by
the candidate, is filed with the school district filing official
not later than 4 p.m. of the third day after the last day for
filing the nominating petition. If the school district filing
official is not a county clerk, the school district filing official
shall notify the county clerk of the candidates' names and
addresses not later than 3 days after the last day for filing a
STM H02152'25 (H-1) 3bm7kr


withdrawal notice.
(11) As used in this section, "local school district" means
that term as defined in section 6 of the revised school code, 1976
PA 451, MCL 380.6.
Sec. 534. A general primary of all political parties except as
provided in sections 532 and 685 must be held in every election
precinct in this state on the Tuesday after the first Monday in
August before every general November election, at which time the
qualified and registered voters of each political party may vote
for party candidates for the office of governor, United States
Senator, Representative in Congress, state senator, representative
in the legislature, county executive, prosecuting attorney,
sheriff, county clerk, county treasurer, register of deeds, drain
commissioner, public works commissioner, county road commissioner,
county mine inspector, surveyor, and candidates for office in
townships, and candidates for school board member of a local school
district. A nomination for an office must be made only if the
official is to be elected at the next succeeding general November
election.
Sec. 697. At the general November election, the names of the
several offices to be voted for must be placed on the ballot
substantially in the following order in the years in which
elections for those offices are held: Electors of President and
Vice President of the United States; governor and lieutenant
governor; secretary of state; attorney general; United States
Senator; Representative in Congress; senator and representative in
the state legislature; members of the state board of education;
regents of the University of Michigan; trustees of Michigan State
University; governors of Wayne State University; county executive;
STM H02152'25 (H-1) 3bm7kr


prosecuting attorney; sheriff; clerk; treasurer; register of deeds;
mine inspector in counties electing a mine inspector; county road
commissioners; drain commissioners; coroners; and surveyor. The
following township officers must be placed on the same ballot as
above described in substantially the following order in the year in
which elections for those offices are held: supervisor, clerk,
treasurer, trustees, and constables. In addition, the office of
local school district board member must be placed on the same
ballot as above in the year in which an election for that office is
held.
Sec. 699. At any regular election, the names of the several
nonpartisan offices to be voted for shall must be placed on a
separate portion of the ballot containing no party designation in
the following order: justices of the supreme court, judges of the
court of appeals, judges of the circuit court, judges of the
probate court, judges of the district court, community college
board of trustees member, intermediate school district board
member, city officers, the following village officers in
substantially the following order in the year in which elections
for the offices are held: president, clerk, treasurer, and
trustees, and in a year in which an election for the office is
held, local school district board member, metropolitan district
officer , and district library board member.
Final Page
STM H02152'25 (H-1) 3bm7kr